Utah statutes.
75-3-610.   Termination of appointment -- Voluntary.
(1)  An appointment of a personal representative terminates as provided in
Section 75-3-1003, one year after the filing of a closing statement.
(2)  An order closing an estate as provided in Section 75-3-1001 or 75-3-1002
terminates an appointment of a personal representative.
(3)  A personal representative may resign his position by filing a written
statement of resignation with the registrar after he has given at least 15
days' written notice to the persons known to be interested in the estate. If
no one applies or petitions for appointment of a successor representative
within the time indicated in the notice, the filed statement of resignation is
ineffective as a termination of appointment and in any event is effective only
upon the appointment and qualification of a successor representative and
delivery of the assets to him.
